Maryland, session 2026, SB0916.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) The Secretary of Agriculture and the Secretary of Natural Resources jointly
shall convene a workgroup to examine challenges and opportunities in the State related to
seafood marketing.
(b) The workgroup convened under this section shall include:
(1) two members of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) two members of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of
the House;
(3) the Secretary of Agriculture, or the Secretary’s designee;
(4) the Secretary of Natural Resources, or the Secretary’s designee; and
(5) (i) representatives of the seafood industry, selected by the Secretary
of Agriculture and the Secretary of Natural Resources; and
(ii) any other stakeholder considered necessary by the Secretary of
Agriculture and the Secretary of Natural Resources.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0916*

SENATE BILL 916
(c) The Department of Agriculture and the Department of Natural Resources
jointly shall provide staff for the workgroup.
(d) On or before December 1, 2026, the Secretary of Agriculture and the Secretary
of Natural Resources jointly shall report the findings of the workgroup convened under this
section and any recommendations of the workgroup, including recommendations for
legislation, to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, the Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and the Environment and the House
Environment and Transportation Committee.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and 1 month and, at the end of June
30, 2027, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.